North Dakota statutes. TITLE 32 Judicial Remedies
CHAPTER 32-12.2 Claims Against the State
32-12.2-14.
Risk management motor vehicle accident review board — Powers — Records — Meetings.

The director of the office of management and budget shall establish a risk management motor vehicle accident review board to review any accident involving a motor vehicle owned or leased by the state and operated by a state employee that results in bodily injury or significant property damage. The board is composed of the director of the department of transportation, or the director’s designee, who shall serve as chairman of the board; the director of the office of management and budget, or the director’s designee; the superintendent of the highway patrol or the superintendent’s designee; and two state employees selected by the other board members to serve two-year terms.

The risk management motor vehicle accident review board shall review accidents involving state-owned or state-leased vehicles operated by state employees that result in bodily injury or significant property damage in order to improve traffic safety and driver training and to reduce the number of traffic accidents. The board shall adopt rules concerning receiving accident reports, holding meetings, receiving verbal or written information, making recommendations, communicating with state agencies and employees, and informing state agencies of its recommendations. Three members of the board constitute a quorum and an affirmative vote of at least three board members is required for the board to take action and make a recommendation.

The duties of the chairman include scheduling meetings; notifying participants; receiving and maintaining board records, reports, and other material; and communicating with agencies concerning the board’s recommendations.

The department of transportation shall report state motor vehicle-related accidents to the board for review involving bodily injury or significant property damage or if there was a citation issued to the state employee operating the state-owned or state-leased motor vehicle. After review, the board may recommend driver training; defensive driver training; emergency vehicle operational training; physical, written, or operational examinations; or restrictions on the use of state-owned or state-leased motor vehicles. The state agency employing the employee operating the state-owned or state-leased motor vehicle involved in the traffic accident shall decide whether to implement the board’s recommendation.

State employees must be paid and may not be required to take any leave for time needed to assist the board, and all state employers shall reimburse their employees for travel expenses incurred in assisting the board.

The board must be deemed to be a state agency loss-control committee under section 32-12.2-12 and all of the board’s current or former members and all participants providing any verbal or written information to the board are entitled to the rights against production of records or testimony as contained in this section.

The department of transportation shall internally review all accidents involving a motor vehicle owned or leased by the state that is not submitted to the board for review to determine whether the accident was preventable and make recommendations to the agency employing the employee involved in the accident which may include recommendations on the same issues as made by the board. The department may defer to the determinations and recommendations of an agency loss control committee approved by the board. An employee may request further review by the board of any determination or recommendation of the department.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 304, § 2; 2011, ch. 246, § 1.

32-12.2-15.
Contracts limiting liability to the state.

Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter to the contrary, an agency may agree to limit the liability of a contractor to the state if the agency determines such services or products cannot be effectively obtained without such limitation and the limitation does not pose any significant risk of loss to the state and is in the best interests of the state. The agency, in consultation with the office of management and budget and the attorney general’s office, shall prepare a written documentation before agreeing to any liability limitation. An agency’s authority to agree to a limitation of liability is limited to contracts for the purchase or lease of, or services related to, software, communication, electronic equipment, and economic forecasting.

An agency may limit its ability to recover indirect consequential damages.

If the extent of potential direct loss is unknown, an agency may agree to limit direct damages to a reasonably estimated amount commensurate with the foreseeable risk of loss to the state. The amount must be equal to twice the total value of the contract, unless all parties to the contract agree to an alternative amount. Any agreed upon amount that is less than twice the value of the contract must be approved by the director of the office of management and budget. The liquidated damages and retainage provisions for delay, missed deadlines, and other breaches are not subject to a general limitation on direct or indirect damages authorized under this section.

A contract under this section may not limit any loss to the state resulting from fraud or other intentional or willful misconduct, breach of confidentiality obligations, or loss resulting from tangible property damage or personal injury.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 301, § 1; 2009, ch. 289, § 1; 2013, ch. 253, § 1; 2021, ch. 260, § 1, effective March 23, 2021.

32-12.2-16.
Ratifying contracts limiting liability to the state.

Any employee or official of an agency who enters a contract requiring the agency to limit the liability of the contracting party without first consulting with the office of management and budget and the attorney general’s office will be deemed to be acting within the scope of the employee’s or official’s employment provided the contract is approved or ratified by the attorney general and the director of the office of management and budget and otherwise meets the conditions contained in section 32-12.2-15.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 301, § 2; 2013, ch. 253, § 2.

32-12.2-17.
Indemnification and insurance requirements in state contracts.

The director of the office of management and budget shall establish guidelines for indemnification and insurance provisions in contracts that may be entered by an executive branch state agency. The director shall consult with representatives of executive branch state agencies, the insurance industry, and the business community to establish and revise the guidelines and provisions. The guidelines must establish procedures for determining the appropriate indemnification and insurance provisions in contracts.

If a contract for services requires a provision for indemnification, the contract must require the contractor to indemnify the state and its agencies, officers, and employees for vicarious liability, but may not require indemnification for the contributory negligence, comparative degree of fault, sole negligence, or intentional misconduct of the state or its agencies, officers, and employees, unless the director of the office of management and budget or the director’s designee determines a more stringent indemnification provision is appropriate. If indemnification is required, the contract must require that the state be endorsed on the contractor’s commercial general liability policy as an additional insured or must require an equivalent form of protection for the state.

This section does not apply to a contract between an executive branch state agency and another person that is the owner of private property that is being used to accommodate a state construction project.

The failure of the state to comply with subsection 2 does not void any part of a contract.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 292, § 1.

32-12.2-18.
Student required driving in educational programs.

Upon request by any state institution of higher education, the office of management and budget, through the risk management fund, shall provide a defense and administer claims against students arising from the operation of a vehicle owned or leased by the state the operation of which is a required part of an established course of study. Liability shall be limited to the required amounts of financial responsibility contained in section 39-16.1-02. Nothing in this chapter makes the state responsible for the actions of the student or requires indemnification for any loss beyond the limits provided in this section, nor provides any benefits to the student except those minimum levels undertaken in a program of self-insurance filed under section 26.1-41-05.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 247, § 1.

32-12.2-19.
Data breach response and remediation costs.

The director of the office of management and budget may pay from the risk management fund costs necessary for notification and remediation following a data breach involving a state entity. The director of the office of management and budget, in consultation with the information technology department and the state entity involved, shall determine what measures are to be taken under this section. Expenditures under this section are limited to two hundred fifty thousand dollars per incident and may be made only to the extent the risk management fund can continue to meet current and future liability obligations and the response and remediation costs are not covered through insurance. The director may purchase insurance and approve the purchase of insurance by state entities to cover data breach response and remediation costs. Each state entity shall contribute the appropriate share of its costs under this section as determined by the director.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 234, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.